Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means an organization that provides agency with choice services.
(b) “Agency  with choice services” means services described in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion that are provided to an individual  by an agency using a self-directed service delivery
model.
(c) “Authorized representative” means a person designated by an individual or  the
individual’s legal representative to act on behalf of  the individual in making decisions on
matters pertaining to the planning and implementation  of an in-home service plan or an in-
dividual support plan.
(d)(A) “Direct support worker” means  a person providing attendant or personal care
services identified in an individual’s individualized service plan as an employee of the agency.
(B) “Direct support  worker” does not mean a home care worker or a personal support
worker as those terms are defined in ORS 410.600.
(e) “Individual” means an individual, or the authorized representative of an  individual,
who receives in-home services and supports through the Department of Human Services or
the Oregon Health Authority and who is:
(A) An older adult;
(B) An individual with a physical disability; or
(C) An individual with behavioral health needs.
(f) “Nurse delegation” means  arranging for tasks that are normally performed only by
licensed nurses to be performed by nursing assistants or other  care providers subject to the
instruction and supervision of a licensed nurse.
(g) “Self-directed service delivery model” means a  model in which an individual is sup-
ported by an agency that functions as the common law employer of direct  support workers
recruited by the  individual and provides financial management services and tasks in place
of the individual. The individual directs the direct support workers and is considered  a co-
employer with the agency.
(2)(a) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules for  the licensing of agencies
providing services to older adults or individuals with physical disabilities.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules  for the licensing of agencies to provide
personal care services to individuals with behavioral health needs through  a state plan
amendment authorized by 42 U.S.C. 1396n(i) and under the state’s 42 U.S.C. 1396n(k) plan.
(3) An agency licensed under subsection (2) of this section shall:
(a) Assist individuals with the following tasks:
(A) Recruiting and selecting direct support workers to be  employed by the agency to
provide the individual’s attendant and  personal care services or removing direct support
workers from the individual’s care team;
(B) Coordinating the schedules of direct support workers, establishing the responsibilities
of direct support workers and ensuring that direct support  workers do not work more than
the hours authorized by the department or the authority;
(C) Training direct support workers with respect to the individual’s unique needs  and
preferences in how the services and supports are delivered;
(D) Supporting the individual in maintaining a safe workplace, in self-direction  and in the
roles and responsibilities of co-employer; and
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 2
(E) Performing other tasks prescribed by the department or the authority by rule.
(b) Be responsible for hiring and terminating direct support workers  who are employed
by the agency.
(c) Perform the following functions:
(A) Submit claims for reimbursement to the department or the authority and pay  direct
support workers  for authorized hours worked and billed in accordance with the electronic
visit verification requirements for providers of services;
(B) Withhold,  file and pay income taxes and all employment-related taxes, including but
not limited to workers’ compensation premiums and unemployment taxes;
(C) Verify the qualifications of each direct support worker as required by federal and
state laws, including by ensuring that each direct support worker passes a  background
check;
(D) Ensure that  direct support workers employed by the agency have access to support
coordination;
(E) Establish a process for:
(i) Identifying, analyzing and correcting adverse events;
(ii) Ensuring the timely reporting of any allegation of abuse, neglect or fiscal
improprieties involving an individual or a direct support worker, immediately responding to
the allegation and reporting the allegation to the appropriate authorities;
(iii) Selecting and tracking  indicators of quality by high-risk, high-volume and problem-
prone areas and indicators of individual safety and the quality of care; and
(iv) Conducting and documenting quality improvement activities;
(F) Meet with individuals  at least every six months, with at least one in-home visit with
the individual each 12 months, as determined jointly with the individual based on the pref-
erences and needs of the individual;
(G) Provide basic, standardized training to direct support workers and ensure that direct
support workers complete and are current with  all training prescribed by the department
and the authority by rule;
(H) Retain a personnel record for each direct  support worker that includes, at a mini-
mum:
(i) Documentation of completed required training and ongoing education;
(ii) Required criminal background checks; and
(iii) Evidence that any health care related license or certificate  held by a direct support
worker is current and that the direct support  worker has not committed any action that
would prevent the direct support worker from providing services; and
(I) Provide other administrative and employment-related supports.
(d) Have in place a process to access and respond to a complaint or grievance  submitted
by an individual about the services provided to the individual by a direct support worker.
(e) Pay any fines or  penalties that may be assessed against an individual if the agency
fails to withhold the correct amounts of taxes  or pay the appropriate employment-related
taxes to mitigate the risk to the individual.
(f) Indemnify an individual for any employment or wage-related claims, damages,  fines
or penalties arising from the individual’s relationship with the agency.
(g) Maintain a drug-free workplace that prohibits direct support workers from being  un-
der the influence of drugs or alcohol when providing services to an individual.
(h) Commit to involving direct  support workers employed by the agency and individuals
served by the agency in the development of and decision-making  about work processes, per-
formance standards, quality improvement  strategies, training, technology use and workplace
safety.
(i) Commit to minimizing the impact of the loss of pay and work hours  for direct support
workers resulting from the hospitalization or death  of an individual or the dismissal of the
direct support worker by the individual.
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 3
(j) Commit to engage and work closely with individuals  in designing and implementing
agency with  choice services by appointing individuals to an advisory board, using focus
groups of individuals or employing other methods, approved by the department or the  au-
thority, for working with individuals.
(k) Promote each individual’s  self-direction and choice and maximize an individual’s au-
tonomy and control over the decisions regarding the individual’s  daily service needs, includ-
ing by:
(A) Using a person-centered approach so that the  individual is at the center of the
decision-making process regarding:
(i) Which attendant and personal care services are needed to  assist the individual in ac-
tivities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living and health-related  tasks, as de-
fined by the department or the authority by rule;
(ii) Which  services are consistent with the individual’s personal and cultural values and
preferences;
(iii) Where and how the services are delivered;
(iv) When the services are delivered; and
(v) Who provides the services;
(B) Enhancing the role of direct support workers as members  of the individual’s care
team, as desired and authorized by the individual and  reflected in the individual’s individ-
ualized service plan developed in accordance  with rules adopted by the department or the
authority; and
(C) Complying with other requirements as prescribed by the department or the authority,
as applicable, by rule.
(L) Have in place  a plan for recruiting and retaining qualified direct support workers to
meet the growing need for direct support workers in this state.
(m) Assist an individual in planning for direct  support worker absences or similar situ-
ations which call for  replacement workers, consistent with the individual’s choice of direct
support workers to provide the services.
(n) Have in place a quality  assurance system and a performance improvement plan to
evaluate and monitor the quality,  safety and appropriateness of the services provided by di-
rect support workers.
(4) Each agency must  enter into a provider agreement with the department or the au-
thority to submit billings to and receive payments from the department  or the authority for
the services furnished by the direct support workers.
(5) An individual has the right to:
(a) Select or  otherwise approve the direct support workers who provide services to the
individual before the direct support workers begin providing the services;
(b) Train direct support workers in  the individual’s specific service needs and in the
provision of services to the individual;
(c) Direct the individual’s own services that are provided by direct support workers;
(d) Require an agency to remove a direct support worker from the individual’s care team;
(e) Report concerns and submit grievances about a direct support worker to the  agency,
the relevant licensing agency or any other appropriate third party, such  as law enforcement
in cases of abuse, neglect or financial misappropriation or improprieties;
(f) Schedule a direct support worker’s time in accordance with the individual’s  desires,
needs and authorized hours; and
(g) Receive employer-related training, as required by federal rules, from a third party.
(6) An individual’s exercise  of any of the functions described in subsection (5) of this
section does not create an employer-employee relationship between the direct support
workers and the individual except as a co-employer with the agency.
(7) The department and the  authority shall establish reimbursement rates for agencies
in accordance with rate methodologies approved by the Centers for Medicare  and Medicaid
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 4
Services. The baseline rates established by the department and  the authority must be suffi-
cient to:
(a) Support substitute staffing needs due to canceled shifts, planned and unplanned ab-
sences of direct support workers,  respite care for individuals’ unpaid caregivers and other
similar needs;
(b) Allow an agency to pay direct support workers wages and benefits  at least equal to
the wages and benefits  provided to home care workers in the collective bargaining agreement
under ORS 410.612; and
(c) Meet the requirements for training and supports for direct  support workers and for
individuals as prescribed by the department or the authority by rule.
(8) The department and  the authority shall establish by rule financial transparency re-
quirements for agencies that include but are not limited to:
(a) Establishing a maximum allowable percentage of the hourly  reimbursement rate paid
to the agency that may be spent on overhead and administrative costs;
(b) Requiring agencies to submit to the department or  the authority detailed cost reports
that include, at a minimum, actual spending by the agency on  direct support worker wages,
benefits and other personnel expenses; and
(c) Requiring agencies to pass through to direct support workers reimbursement rate
increases that are targeted for wages and benefits of direct support workers.
(9) Nurse delegation is the responsibility of the department or the authority and not the
responsibility of an agency and shall be operated in the same manner as nurse delegation  for
home care workers, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(10) The department and the authority shall conduct  a competitive procurement process
to select agency with choice services providers.  The department and the authority may
contract with no more than two agencies in total to provide agency with choice services.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (13) of this section, an agency that seeks  to con-
tract with the department or the authority to provide agency with choice services must  first
provide a labor peace agreement that:
(a) Is signed or  certified by an authorized representative of a labor organization that
represents employees in this state or a neighboring state who provide services similar to the
direct support worker services provided by  the direct support workers employed by the
agency and that seeks to represent the direct support workers employed by the agency; and
(b) Includes a process for the resolution of labor disputes with the direct support workers
employed by the agency.
(12) The department or the authority may contract with an agency that has not provided
a labor peace agreement described in subsection (11) of this section if:
(a)(A) A labor organization is  currently certified to represent the direct support workers
employed by the agency and the labor organization  informs the agency that the labor or-
ganization does not wish to enter into a labor peace agreement with the agency; and
(B) The agency demonstrates to the satisfaction  of the department or the authority that
the agency has processes in  place to ensure the uninterrupted delivery of direct support
worker services in the event of a labor dispute; or
(b)(A) The agency notifies in writing all  labor organizations certified to represent em-
ployees in this state who provide services similar to the services to be provided by the direct
support workers employed by the consumer-directed employer that the agency  wishes to
enter into a labor peace agreement; and
(B) Three weeks following the date on which the notice was given:
(i) No labor organization responds to the notice; or
(ii) No labor organization expresses  an interest in representing the direct support work-
ers employed by the agency.
(13) The department or the authority may deny, suspend or revoke the license, certificate
or endorsement,  as applicable, of an agency or may impose a civil penalty, in accordance with
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 5
ORS 183.745, on an agency for the  agency’s failure to comply with this section or rules
adopted in accordance with this section. A  failure to comply includes but is not limited to
a:
(a) Failure by the agency to provide required agency with choice services;
(b) Failure by the agency to correct deficiencies identified during  a program review or
an investigation by the department or authority;
(c) Demonstrated pattern, over the previous two  years, of significant and substantiated
violations of employment or wage laws in the state by:
(A) An agency as an employer of direct support workers; or
(B) A person applying to become an agency providing agency with choice services in  any
business owned or operated by the person; or
(d) Failure of an agency to comply with ORS 443.004.
(14) This section does  not supersede or limit any other authority of the department or
the authority with regard to oversight of contracting entities  or the imposition of civil pen-
alties.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Health Authority and the Department of  Human Services shall
contract with up to two agencies  to provide agency with choice services in accordance with
section 1 of this 2024 Act no later than January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section “agency with choice services” and “self-directed
service delivery model” have the meanings given those terms in section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(2) After the self-directed service delivery model of providing agency with choice  services
under section 1 of this 2024 Act has  been in operation for at least two years serving indi-
viduals receiving medical assistance:
(a) The Department of Human Services may expand the categories  of individuals who can
be served by an agency with choice services provider under section  1 of this 2024 Act to in-
clude clients of the Oregon Project Independence program described in  ORS 410.430, 410.435,
410.440 and 410.450.
(b) Subject to subsection (3) of this section,  the Home Care Commission, created under
ORS 410.602, may expand the categories of individuals  who can be served by an agency with
choice services provider under section 1 of this  2024 Act to include clients of the private pay
home care worker program described in ORS 410.605.
(3) Before the commission  may choose to expand the categories of individuals to include
private pay home care worker clients, the department  shall convene a group of stakeholders
to assist the department in conducting an analysis of data to  inform the commission’s deci-
sion. The data must  be collected from the prior two years, at least, of operation of the self-
directed service delivery model of  providing agency with choice services to medical
assistance recipients and must include:
(a) The options accessible  to Oregonians for receiving in-home care and services, in-
cluding the cost of the care and trends in the supply and demand for in-home services;
(b) The feasibility of and process for contracting with a  third party to administer, in
whole or in part, a program  to provide agency with choice services to private pay home care
worker clients;
(c) Whether new regulatory or oversight structures need to be put in  place to ensure the
safety of private pay home care worker clients and the quality of care; and
(d) The costs and benefits to the  state for expanding agency with choice services to pri-
vate pay home care worker clients and the options for funding the expansion.
SECTION 4.  ORS 124.050 is amended to read:
124.050. As used in ORS 124.050 to 124.095:
(1) “Abuse” means one or more of the following:
(a) Any physical injury to an elderly  person caused by other than accidental means, or which
appears to be at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(b) Neglect.
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 6
(c) Abandonment, including desertion or willful forsaking of an elderly  person or the withdrawal
or neglect of duties and obligations owed an elderly person by a caretaker or other person.
(d) Willful infliction of physical pain or injury upon an elderly person.
(e) An act that constitutes a crime under  ORS 163.375, 163.405, 163.411, 163.415, 163.425, 163.427,
163.465, 163.467 or 163.525.
(f) Verbal abuse.
(g) Financial exploitation.
(h) Sexual abuse.
(i) Involuntary seclusion of an  elderly person for the convenience of a caregiver or to discipline
the person.
(j) A wrongful use of a physical or  chemical restraint of an elderly person, excluding an act of
restraint prescribed by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 and  any treatment activities
that are consistent with an approved treatment plan or in connection with a court order.
(2) “Elderly person” means  any person 65 years of age or older who is not subject to the pro-
visions of ORS 441.640 to 441.665.
(3) “Facility” means:
(a) A long term care facility as that term is defined in ORS 442.015.
(b) A residential facility as that term is defined in ORS 443.400, including but not limited to an
assisted living facility.
(c) An adult foster home as that term is defined in ORS 443.705.
(4) “Financial exploitation” means:
(a) Wrongfully taking the assets, funds  or property belonging to or intended for the use of an
elderly person or a person with a disability.
(b) Alarming an elderly person or a person with a disability by  conveying a threat to wrongfully
take or appropriate money or property of the person if the person would  reasonably believe that the
threat conveyed would be carried out.
(c) Misappropriating, misusing or transferring without authorization any money  from any ac-
count held jointly or singly by an elderly person or a person with a disability.
(d) Failing to use the income or assets of  an elderly person or a person with a disability effec-
tively for the support and maintenance of the person.
(5) “Intimidation” means compelling or deterring conduct by threat.
(6) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) Any city or municipal police department.
(b) Any county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) Any district attorney.
(e) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(7) “Neglect” means  failure to provide basic care or services that are necessary to maintain the
health or safety of an elderly person.
(8) “Person with a disability” means a person described in:
(a) ORS 410.040 (7); or
(b) ORS 410.715.
(9) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677, naturopathic physician or
chiropractor, including any intern or resident.
(b) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(c) Employee of the Department  of Human Services or community developmental disabilities
program.
(d) Employee of the Oregon Health Authority, local health department or community  mental
health program.
(e) Peace officer.
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 7
(f) Member of the clergy.
(g) Regulated social worker.
(h) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(i) Senior center employee.
(j) Information and referral or outreach worker.
(k) Licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist.
(L) Elected official of a branch of government of this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this state or  of a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(m) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(n) Psychologist.
(o) Provider of adult foster care or an employee of the provider.
(p) Audiologist.
(q) Speech-language pathologist.
(r) Attorney.
(s) Dentist.
(t) Optometrist.
(u) Chiropractor.
(v) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(w) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(x) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 443.370.
(y) A person providing agency with choice services  under ORS 427.181  or section 1 of this 2024
Act.
(10) “Services” includes but is not limited  to the provision of food, clothing, medicine, housing,
medical services, assistance with bathing or personal hygiene or any  other service essential to the
well-being of an elderly person.
(11)(a) “Sexual abuse” means:
(A) Sexual contact with an elderly  person who does not consent or is considered incapable of
consenting to a sexual act under ORS 163.315;
(B) Verbal or physical harassment  of a sexual nature, including but not limited to severe or
pervasive exposure to sexually explicit material or language;
(C) Sexual exploitation;
(D) Any sexual contact between an employee of a facility or paid caregiver and  an elderly per-
son served by the facility or caregiver; or
(E) Any sexual contact that is achieved through force, trickery, threat or coercion.
(b) “Sexual abuse” does not mean consensual sexual contact between an elderly person and:
(A) An employee of a facility who is also the spouse of the elderly person; or
(B) A paid caregiver.
(12) “Sexual contact” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.305.
(13) “Verbal abuse” means to threaten significant physical or emotional harm  to an elderly
person or a person with a disability through the use of:
(a) Derogatory or inappropriate names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or ridicule; or
(b) Harassment, coercion, threats, intimidation, humiliation, mental  cruelty or inappropriate
sexual comments.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 443.305 is amended to read:
443.305. As used in ORS 443.305 to 443.350:
(1) “In-home care agency” means an agency primarily engaged  in providing in-home care ser-
vices for compensation to an  individual in that individual’s place of residence. “In-home  care
agency” does not include a home health agency as defined  in ORS 443.014  or an agency with
choice services provider under ORS 427.181 .
(2) “In-home care services” means personal care  services furnished by an in-home care agency,
or an individual under  an arrangement or contract with an in-home care agency, that are necessary
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 8
to assist an individual in meeting the individual’s  daily needs, but does not include curative or
rehabilitative services.
(3) “Subunit” means an  in-home care agency that provides services for a parent agency in a
geographic area different from that of the parent agency and  more than 60 miles from the location
of the parent agency.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $414,498 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $414,498 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8.  Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is
increased by $60,041 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$766 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $52,638 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for shared services, is increased by $158,179 for carrying out
sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Health Systems Division - Programs, is  increased by
$926,738 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 9
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health  Systems Division - Programs, is in-
creased by $1,003,003 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs,  is in-
creased by $34,225 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 15.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for  shared administrative services, is
increased by $1,235 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 16.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (7), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $27,688 for carrying out sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4129 (HB 4129-B) Page 10